Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HOUSING ASSISTANCE
SECTION 1.  ORS 458.392 is amended to read:
458.392. (1) There is established the Long-Term Rent Assistance Fund, separate and distinct from
the General Fund.
(2) The Long-Term Rent Assistance Fund shall consist of moneys credited to  the fund from
moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly  or received from the
federal government or other grants, gifts or donations from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community Services
Department to :
(a) Provide rental assistance and other supportive  services to people who are experienc-
ing, or are at risk of experiencing, homelessness; and
(b) Carry out the duties under ORS 458.390.
PRIVATE SECURITY ENTITIES
SECTION 2. The Private Security Entity Account is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct  from the General Fund. The Private Security Entity Account consists
of moneys  deposited in the account under ORS 181A.900 (3). Moneys in the account are con-
tinuously appropriated to the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training for the
purpose of payment to persons entitled thereto.
SECTION 3.  ORS 181A.900 is amended to read:
181A.900. (1) The Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training shall establish by rule
standards and procedures for the licensing of private security entities.
(2) Rules adopted under this section  must require that an applicant for a private security entity
license:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-A) Page 1
(a) Submit a written application to the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training on
a form approved by the department;
(b) Register the entity as a business with the Secretary of State;
(c) Be the principal owner  or principal partner who exercises operational control over the en-
tity;
(d) Designate an executive manager licensed by the department;
(e) Be covered by a general liability  insurance policy for which the applicant is a primary in-
sured that includes public liability, personal injury and  property damage insurance covering all as-
pects of the private security services being provided;
(f) Maintain and make available to the  department upon request records of the training hours
completed by each private security provider employed by the entity;
(g) Demonstrate  the existence of use of force and citizen arrest policies, unless the private se-
curity entity exclusively monitors alarm systems; and
(h) Provide the following information to the department:
(A) The names  and addresses of all persons financially interested, whether as partners, share-
holders, associates  or profit-sharers, in the applicant’s proposed operations as a private security
entity, together  with the amount of their respective interests, and whether or not, to the best of the
applicant’s knowledge,  any of these persons was ever denied a certificate or a license under ORS
181A.870 within the preceding three years, or had a certificate or license suspended or  revoked
within the preceding three years;
(B) Proof of the existence of adequate insurance under rules issued by the department;
(C) Proof of compliance with business tax requirements;
(D) Any claims for unpaid wages that have been made against the applicant within the preceding
two years;
(E) The physical address of the work location  or locations at which private security services
are provided by private security professionals employed by or pursuant to a contract or  subcontract
with the applicant; and
(F) For each work location at which private security services are provided  by private security
professionals pursuant to a contract or subcontract with the applicant,  the names of the private
security entity or entities contracted or subcontracted with the applicant.
(3) Each applicant shall submit with the application for a private security entity  license, proof
of financial ability to promptly pay the wages of executive managers, private  security professionals
and supervisory managers employed by or  who contract with the private security entity. The proof
required in this subsection shall be in an amount and form  as established by the department by rule,
including but not limited to, a corporate surety bond, a  cash deposit or a deposit the equivalent of
cash. Amounts received by the department under this subsection must be  deposited in the
Private Security Entity Account established under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) The department shall establish fees for issuing licenses to private security  entities. The fees
may not exceed the prorated direct costs of administering:
(a) The licensing program required by this section;
(b) The license examinations required by ORS 181A.904; and
(c) The investigations required by ORS 181A.902.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 181A.890 is amended to read:
181A.890. Except as provided in ORS 181A.900 (3),  all moneys received by the  Department of
Public Safety Standards and Training under ORS 181A.840  to 181A.918 and 181A.995, including
penalties recovered  under ORS 181A.995 (2), shall be paid into the General Fund in the State
Treasury and placed to the credit of  the Police Standards and Training Account established in ORS
181A.665.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT HOUSING SUPPORT
SECTION 5.  Section 37, chapter 223, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-A) Page 2
Sec. 37.  (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in consultation with the De-
partment of Land  Conservation and Development and the Housing and Community Services De-
partment, shall  provide [ grants] a grant to Oregon Economic Development Districts, an Oregon
nonprofit corporation,  to be distributed  to councils of governments, as defined in ORS 294.900,
and economic development districts to support  housing and community development capacity within
cities and counties in this state and within the nine federally recognized Indian tribes  in this state.
(2) Councils of governments and economic development  districts receiving [ grants] distributions
under this section shall  partner and consult with local governments, developers, financiers, the De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development, the  Housing and Community Services Department,
other relevant state agencies and other interested public and private partners to enable local gov-
ernments throughout the region to  encourage community development and the development of
infrastructure and needed housing, as defined in [ section 23, chapter  13, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled
House Bill 2001) ] ORS 197A.018 , by:
(a) Bridging any information gaps;
(b) Identifying and securing  needed resources, including infrastructure and community facilities;
(c) Connecting producers of needed housing with consumers of needed housing; and
(d) Working with representatives of historically underrepresented groups to  overcome
community-specific barriers to obtaining housing.
SECTION 6.
 Section 39, chapter 223, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec 39.  In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000,  to provide [ grants] the grant  under section 37 [ of this 2023
Act], chapter 223, Oregon Laws 2023 .
FUND TRANSFERS
SECTION 7. Section 33, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed.
SECTION 8.  Section 33a, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 33a.  Notwithstanding ORS  243.167, the amount of [ $50,000,000] $90,000,000 is transferred
from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund to the Insurance Fund  established under ORS 278.425.
The transfer shall be made on [ May 31, 2025 ] May 1, 2024 .
TIDE GATE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 9.  Section 22a, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), as amended
by section 36, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 22a. The Tide Gate Grant and Loan Fund established under section 21, chapter 10, Oregon
Laws 2020 (second special session), is abolished on June 30, [ 2024] 2025. Any moneys remaining  in
the fund  on that date shall be transferred to the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund established under ORS 461.540.
SECTION 10.  Section 23, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), as  amended
by section 37, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  Sections 21 and 22, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), are repealed
on June 30, [ 2024] 2025.
WATER CONSERVATION PROJECTS
SECTION 11. ORS 568.974 is repealed.
SECTION 12. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  provide a grant
to the Central Oregon Intergovernmental Council to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-A) Page 3
(1) In rural areas of this state, coordinate efforts to identify  and apply for sources of
funding for western juniper treatment, or other water conservation projects, among  cities,
counties or other organizations; and
(2) Coordinate activities among grant recipients described in ORS 568.972.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 568.976 is amended to read:
568.976. Recipients of grants described in ORS  568.970, as well as organizations described in
[ORS 568.974] section 12 of this 2024 Act  and sections 51 and 52, chapter 606, Oregon Laws  2023,
may accept moneys from  state agencies, federal or private funds or grants or the Emergency Board,
in addition to the grants, for purposes described in ORS 568.970 and 568.972.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 15. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1501 (SB 1501-A) Page 4